Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. PUBLIC RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

SUBTITLE B. EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM OF TEXAS

CHAPTER 813. CREDITABLE SERVICE

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 813.001. TYPES OF CREDITABLE SERVICE. The types of service creditable in the retirement system are membership service and, if applicable, military service and equivalent membership service.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.001 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 297, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 940 (S.B. 321), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 813.0015. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO CASH BALANCE GROUP MEMBERS. The following provisions of this chapter do not apply to a cash balance group member:

(1) Sections 813.102, 813.104, 813.106, 813.202, 813.402, 813.403, 813.404, 813.502, 813.504, 813.505, 813.509, 813.511, 813.513, and 813.514; and

(2) Subchapter D.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 940 (S.B. 321), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 78 (S.B. 729), Sec. 2, eff. May 19, 2023.

Sec. 813.002. SERVICE CREDITABLE IN A YEAR. The board of trustees by rule shall determine how much service in any year is equivalent to one year of creditable service, but in no case may all of a person's service in one year be creditable as more than one year of service.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.002 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO ESTABLISHMENT OF SERVICE

Sec. 813.101. DETERMINATION OF REQUIRED DEPOSITS. The retirement system shall determine in each case the amount of money to be deposited by a member claiming credit for membership or military service previously canceled or not previously established. The system may not provide benefits based on the claimed service until the determined amount has been fully paid.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.101 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 813.102. SERVICE CREDIT PREVIOUSLY CANCELED. (a) A member who has withdrawn contributions and canceled service credit in a class of membership may, if eligible as provided by Section 813.403 or 813.504, reestablish the canceled service credit in the retirement system.

(b) A member may reestablish credit by depositing with the retirement system in a lump sum the amount withdrawn from a membership class, plus interest computed on the basis of the state fiscal year at an annual rate of 10 percent from the date of withdrawal to the date of redeposit.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.102 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 347 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2006.

Sec. 813.104. ALTERNATIVE PAYMENTS AND METHODS TO ESTABLISH OR REESTABLISH SERVICE CREDIT. (a) The board of trustees may adopt rules to provide procedures for making installment payments to establish or reestablish credit in the retirement system as alternatives to lump-sum payments otherwise authorized or required by this subtitle. The methods may include payment by payroll deduction.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), payments may not be made under a rule adopted under this section:

(1) to establish or reestablish service credit of a person who is currently retired or has died; or

(2) to establish current service under Section 813.201.

(c) Under a rule adopted under this section, the designated beneficiary of a deceased member or, if none exists, the personal representative of the decedent's estate may establish or reestablish service for which the member was eligible at the time of death if the establishment of the service would result in the payment of a death benefit annuity or an increase in the amount of a death benefit annuity.

(d) The payment for the establishment or reestablishment of service under Subsection (c) must be made in a lump sum and completed before the first payment of a death benefit annuity, but not later than the 60th day after the date the retirement system receives notice of the death.

(e) The retirement system may provide for the electronic filing of agreements to establish or reestablish service credit. In this subsection, "electronic filing" has the meaning assigned by Section 814.010(a).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 964, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1111, Sec. 14, 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 49, 50, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 813.106. SERVICE NOT PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED. The state shall make contributions for service not previously established that is established under Section 813.104 in the amount provided by Section 813.202(c) for membership service or the amount provided by Section 813.302(d) for military service, as applicable. The state contributions will be made at the time the service credit is granted.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 964, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER C. ESTABLISHMENT OF MEMBERSHIP SERVICE

Sec. 813.201. CURRENT SERVICE. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, service is credited in the applicable membership class for each month in which a member holds a position and for which the required contributions are made by the member and the state.

(b) A member may not accrue or establish service credit in the employee class of membership when the total amount of service credit, multiplied by the percentage in effect for computing annuities under Section 814.103, 814.105, or 814.107 would exceed the number 100. When the maximum amount of service credit is accrued or established by a member in the employee or elected class, member and state contributions cease, although the member retains membership subject to Section 812.005.

(c) Service may not be credited in both membership classes for the same period unless one of the credits is for service established under Section 813.402 of this subtitle.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.201 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 616, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1231, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 813.202. MEMBERSHIP SERVICE NOT PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED. (a) Except as provided by Section 813.402, any member may establish service credit in the retirement system for membership service not previously established.

(b) A member may establish credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system in a lump sum a contribution computed as provided by Section 813.404 or 813.505, plus interest computed on the basis of the state fiscal year at an annual rate of 10 percent from the date the service was performed to the date of deposit.

(c) The state shall contribute for service established under this section an amount in the same ratio to the member's contribution and interest paid under Subsection (b) for the service as the state's contribution bears to the contribution for current service required of a member of the employee class at the time the service is established under this section. The state's contribution and interest must be paid from the fund or account from which the member receives compensation at the time the service is established or, if the member does not hold a position at the time the service is established, from the fund or account from which the member received compensation when the member most recently held a position.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 252, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.202 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1459), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. ESTABLISHMENT OF MILITARY SERVICE

Sec. 813.301. CREDITABLE MILITARY SERVICE. (a) Military service creditable in the retirement system is active federal duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States.

(b) A member may establish one month of service credit for each month or fraction of a month of duty, but not more than 60 months of service credit in the retirement system for military service.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.301 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 813.302. MILITARY SERVICE NOT PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED. (a) An eligible member may establish service credit in the retirement system for military service performed that is creditable as provided by Section 813.301.

(b) A member eligible to establish military service credit is one who:

(1) does not receive and is not eligible to receive federal retirement payments based on 20 years or more of active federal military duty;

(2) has been released from military duty under conditions not dishonorable; and

(3) has credit in the retirement system for membership service performed after the member's date of release from active military duty.

(c) A member may establish credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system in a lump sum a contribution computed as provided by Section 813.404 or 813.505, plus, if the member does not establish the credit before the first anniversary of the date of first eligibility, interest computed on the basis of the state fiscal year at an annual rate of 10 percent from the date of first eligibility to the date of deposit.

(d) The state shall contribute for service established under this section an amount in the same ratio to the member's contribution for the service as the state's contribution bears to the contribution for current service required of a member of the employee class at the time the service is established under this section. The state's contribution shall be paid from the fund from which the member receives compensation at the time the service is established or, if the member does not hold a position at the time the service is established, from the fund from which the member received compensation when the member most recently held a position.

(e) The board of trustees may require members applying for credit under this section to submit any information the board finds necessary to enable it to determine eligibility for or amount of service or amounts of required contributions.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 252, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.302 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1459), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 813.303. SERVICE CREDITED TO MEMBERSHIP CLASS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or Section 813.304(d), military service is creditable in a class of membership that includes a position held by the member who performed the service after the date of release from active military duty.

(b) Military service performed by a person who was a contributing member immediately before the date the member began military duty may be credited, at the option of the member, in the class of membership that includes the position held by the member immediately before the date the member began the military duty.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.303 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 813.304. USE OF MILITARY SERVICE CREDIT. (a) The retirement system shall use military service credit in computing occupational disability retirement benefits and death benefits and in determining eligibility to select an optional death benefit plan.

(b) The retirement system shall use military service credit in computing service retirement or nonoccupational disability retirement benefits of a member of the employee class only if the member has, without military service credit, at least five years of service credit in that class.

(c) The retirement system shall use military service credit in computing service retirement or nonoccupational disability retirement benefits of a member of the elected class:

(1) only if the member has, without military service credit, at least six years of service credit in that class, if the military service credit was established before January 1, 1978; or

(2) only if the member has enough service credit, exclusive of the military service credit, to be eligible for service retirement benefits at age 60, if the military service credit was established on or after January 1, 1978.

(d) The board of trustees by rule may permit a person who retires with at least 10 years of service credit, excluding military service credit, to receive service retirement benefits as an elected officer for the percentage of the person's military service credit, but not more than 100 percent, that is derived by dividing the number of months served as an elected officer by 96 months.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.304 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 813.305. MILITARY SERVICE CREDIT GOVERNED BY UNIFORMED SERVICES EMPLOYMENT AND REEMPLOYMENT RIGHTS ACT. The retirement system may adopt rules to comply with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (38 U.S.C. Section 4301 et seq.) and other federal laws affecting the crediting of military service.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER E. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO ELECTED CLASS

Sec. 813.401. SERVICE CREDITABLE IN ELECTED CLASS. Service creditable in the elected class of membership is:

(1) membership service in an office included in that class; and

(2) for members other than cash balance group members:

(A) military service established as provided by Subchapter D; and

(B) equivalent membership service specifically made creditable in that class.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.401 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 297, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 940 (S.B. 321), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 813.402. CREDIT FOR YEAR IN WHICH ELIGIBLE FOR OFFICE. (a) A member may establish service credit in the elected class for any calendar year during any part of which:

(1) the member held an office included in that class; or

(2) the member was eligible to take the oath for an office included in that class.

(b) A member may establish credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system in a lump sum a contribution computed as provided by Section 813.404, plus interest computed at an annual rate of 10 percent from the fiscal year in which the service was performed to the date of deposit.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1110, ch. 252, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.402 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 813.403. ELIGIBILITY FOR SERVICE CREDIT PREVIOUSLY CANCELED. A member may, under Section 813.102(b), reestablish service credit previously canceled if the member, after cancellation of the credit, takes an oath of office for a position included in the elected class.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.403 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 813.404. CONTRIBUTIONS FOR SERVICE NOT PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED. For each month of membership, military, or equivalent membership service not previously credited in the retirement system, a member claiming credit in the elected class shall pay a contribution in an amount equal to the greater of:

(1) eight percent of the monthly salary paid to members of the legislature at the time the credit is established; or

(2) the appropriate member contribution provided by Section 815.402 for a person who holds, at the time the credit is established, the office for which credit is sought.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.404 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 297, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1249 (S.B. 1664), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER F. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO EMPLOYEE CLASS

Sec. 813.501. SERVICE CREDITABLE IN EMPLOYEE CLASS. Service creditable in the employee class of membership is:

(1) membership service in a position included in that class;

(2) military service established as provided by Subchapter D;

(3) service creditable in or transferred from the elected class as provided by Section 813.503; and

(4) administrative board service established as provided by Section 813.502.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.501 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 813.502. ADMINISTRATIVE BOARD SERVICE. (a) A member who established during December, 1977, service credit for administrative board service performed during that month, may:

(1) remain a contributing member of the retirement system accruing service credit in the employee class for continuous service on an eligible board; and

(2) establish service credit for previous service on an eligible board.

(b) Contributions for administrative board service are computed on the basis of the highest salary paid during the time for which credit is sought to an officer or employee of the agency, commission, or department on whose board the member serves.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.502 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 813.503. CREDIT TRANSFERABLE BETWEEN ELECTED AND EMPLOYEE CLASS. (a) Subject to Subsection (a-1), a member may establish in, or have transferred to, the employee class all service credited in the elected class, if the contributions made to establish the service in the elected class equal or exceed contributions required of a member of the employee class for the same amount of service during the same time and at the same rate of compensation. Subject to Subsection (a-1), a member or retiree who has, or had at the time of retirement, at least eight years of service credit in the elected class of membership, exclusive of military service, may transfer service credit between classes before or after retirement.

(a-1) A member or retiree who takes the oath of office for a position included in the elected class of membership, other than a district attorney or criminal district attorney, may not transfer service to the employee class under Subsection (a) until the person no longer holds that position.

(b) A member or retiree who has, or had at the time of retirement, at least 20 years of service credit in the retirement system, including the sum of at least 10 years of service credit as a person who has been elected or appointed to two or more offices of a house of the legislature, as recorded in the journals of the senate and the house of representatives, may transfer the person's service credit to the elected class. A person who makes a transfer under this subsection may continue to transfer the credit between classes before or after retirement.

(c) A retiree, or the designated beneficiary of a deceased retiree, who retired from the employee class and was eligible to have retired from the elected class may elect to have the annuity recomputed as if the retirement had been from the elected class.

(d) A person may make a transfer or election under this section by notifying the retirement system. If the person making the transfer or election is a retiree or the designated beneficiary of a deceased retiree, payment of benefits under the recomputed annuity begins with the payment that becomes due in the month following the month in which the retirement system receives the notice.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., 1st C.S., p. 199, ch. 18, Sec. 12, eff. Nov. 10, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.503 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 998 (H.B. 408), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 813.504. ELIGIBILITY FOR SERVICE CREDIT PREVIOUSLY CANCELED. A person may reestablish service credit previously canceled in the retirement system if the person is a member of the employee class and at least six months have elapsed since the end of the month in which the cancellation became effective.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.504 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1231, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1111, Sec. 46(4), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 347 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 813.505. CONTRIBUTIONS FOR SERVICE NOT PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED. (a) A member claiming credit in the employee class for membership service not previously established shall, for each month of the service, pay a contribution in an amount equal to the greater of:

(1) the appropriate member contribution provided by Section 815.402 for the service during the time for which credit is sought; or

(2) $18.

(b) A member claiming credit in the employee class for military service not previously established shall, for each month of the service, pay a contribution in an amount equal to the greater of:

(1) the amount that the member contributed for the first full month of membership service that is after the member's date of release from active military duty and that is credited in the retirement system; or

(2) $18.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1111, ch. 252, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.505 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1249 (S.B. 1664), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 813.506. CUSTODIAL OFFICER SERVICE. (a) The Texas Department of Criminal Justice, the managed health care unit of The University of Texas Medical Branch, and the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center by rule shall adopt standards for determining eligibility for service credit as a custodial officer, based on the need to encourage early retirement of persons whose duties are hazardous and require them to have routine contact with inmates of or defendants confined in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice on a regular basis.

(b) To be creditable as custodial officer service, service performed must be performed as a parole officer or caseworker or must meet the requirements of the rules adopted under Subsection (a) and be performed by persons in one of the following job categories:

(1) all persons classified as Correctional Officer I through warden, including training officers and special operations reaction team officers;

(2) all other employees assigned to work on a unit and whose jobs require routine contact with inmates or defendants, including but not limited to farm managers, livestock supervisors, maintenance foremen, shop foremen, medical assistants, food service supervisors, stewards, education consultants, commodity specialists, and correctional counselors;

(3) employees assigned to administrative offices whose jobs require routine contact with inmates or defendants at least 50 percent of the time, including but not limited to investigators, compliance monitors, accountants routinely required to audit unit operations, sociologists, interviewers, classification officers, and supervising counselors; and

(4) administrative positions whose jobs require response to emergency situations involving inmates or defendants, including but except as specified not limited to the director, deputy directors, assistant directors, and not more than 25 administrative duty officers.

(c) The Texas Department of Criminal Justice, the managed health care unit of The University of Texas Medical Branch or the Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, or the Board of Pardons and Paroles, as applicable, shall determine a person's eligibility to receive credit as a custodial officer. A determination of the department, unit, or board may not be appealed by an employee but is subject to change by the retirement system.

(d) As part of the audit of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321, the state auditor may verify the accuracy of reports submitted to the retirement system under this section.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 828, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 23.506 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 80, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 599, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 56(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 56(7), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.083, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 813.509. CREDIT FOR ACCUMULATED SICK LEAVE. (a) A member who holds a position included in the employee class of membership during the month that includes the effective date of the member's retirement and who retires based on service or a disability is entitled to service credit in the retirement system for the member's sick leave that has accumulated and is unused on the last day of employment.

(b) A death benefit designee under Section 814.301 or 814.302 of a member who holds a position included in the employee class of membership during the month that includes the member's date of death is entitled to service credit in the retirement system for the member's sick leave that has accumulated and is unused on the member's date of death.

(c) Sick leave is creditable in the retirement system at the rate of one month of service credit for each 20 days, or 160 hours, of accumulated sick leave and one month for each fraction of days or hours remaining after division of the total hours of accumulated sick leave by 160.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618, Sec. 26(a)(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618, Sec. 26(a)(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (g), the disbursing officer of each department or agency shall, before the 11th day after the effective date of retirement or date of death of one or more employees of the department or agency, certify to the retirement system:

(1) the name of each person:

(A) whose retirement from the department or agency, and from state service, became effective during the preceding month; or

(B) who died during the preceding month; and

(2) the amount of the person's accumulated sick leave on the last day of employment or date of death.

(g) The disbursing officer of a department or agency that employs a member who applies for retirement under Subsection (d) shall, not more than 90 or less than 30 days before the effective date of the member's retirement, certify to the retirement system the amount of the member's accumulated and unused sick leave. The officer shall immediately notify the retirement system if the member uses sick leave after the date of certification.

(h) On receipt of a certification under Subsection (f) or (g), the retirement system shall grant any credit to which a retiring member or retiree who is a subject of the certification is entitled. An increase in the computation of an annuity because of credit provided by this section after a certification under Subsection (f) begins with the first payment that becomes due after certification.

(i) The retirement system shall cancel the retirement of a person who used sick leave creditable under this section to qualify for service retirement if the sick leave is otherwise used by the person before the effective date of retirement.

(j) In this section, "sick leave" does not include credit granted under an agency sick-leave pool or under the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (Pub. L. 103-3) and its subsequent amendments.

(k) A member or a death benefit beneficiary of that member may use sick leave creditable under this section only for purposes of calculating the member's or beneficiary's annuity.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Title 110B, Sec. 23.509 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1100, Sec. 4.10(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 791, Sec. 8, 56(1), eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 9, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1048, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1231, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 2559), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1459), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1459), Sec. 26(a)(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 813.511. CREDIT FOR ACCUMULATED ANNUAL LEAVE. (a) A member who holds a position included in the employee class of membership during the month that includes the effective date of the member's retirement and who retires based on service or a disability is entitled to service credit in the retirement system for the member's annual leave that has accumulated and is unused on the last day of employment, unless the member opts to receive for that accumulated leave a lump-sum payment under Section 661.091.

(b) A death benefit designee under Section 814.301 or 814.302 of a member who holds a position included in the employee class of membership during the month that includes the member's date of death is entitled to service credit in the retirement system for the member's annual leave that has accumulated and is unused on the member's date of death.

(c) Annual leave is creditable in the retirement system at the rate of one month of service credit for each 20 days, or 160 hours, of accumulated annual leave and one month for each fraction of days or hours remaining after division of the total hours of accumulated annual leave by 160.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618, Sec. 26(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618, Sec. 26(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (g), the disbursing officer of each department or agency shall, before the 11th day after the effective date of retirement or date of death of one or more employees of the department or agency, certify to the retirement system:

(1) the name of each person:

(A) whose retirement from the department or agency, and from state service, became effective during the preceding month; or

(B) who died during the preceding month; and

(2) the amount of the person's accumulated annual leave on the last day of employment or date of death.

(g) The disbursing officer of a department or agency that employs a member who applies for retirement under Subsection (d) shall, not more than 90 or less than 30 days before the effective date of the member's retirement, certify to the retirement system the amount of the member's accumulated and unused annual leave. The officer shall immediately notify the retirement system if the member uses annual leave after the date of certification.

(h) On receipt of a certification under Subsection (f) or (g), the retirement system shall grant any credit to which a retiring member or retiree who is a subject of the certification is entitled. An increase in the computation of an annuity because of credit provided by this section after a certification under Subsection (f) begins with the first payment that becomes due after certification.

(i) The retirement system shall cancel the retirement of a person who used annual leave creditable under this section to qualify for service retirement if the annual leave is otherwise used by the person before the effective date of retirement.

(j) A member or a death benefit beneficiary of that member may use annual leave creditable under this section only for purposes of calculating the member's or beneficiary's annuity.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1541, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1231, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 2559), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1459), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 1459), Sec. 26(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 813.513. CREDIT PURCHASE OPTION. (a) An eligible member may establish not more than 36 months of equivalent membership service credit, including law enforcement or custodial officer service, in either the elected class or the employee class.

(b) A member is eligible to establish service credit under this section if the member has at least 120 months of actual membership service of the type of service that the member seeks to establish.

(c) A member may establish service credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system, for each month of service credit, the actuarial present value, at the time of deposit, of the additional standard retirement annuity benefits that would be attributable to the purchase of the service credit under this section, based on rates and tables recommended by the retirement system's actuary and adopted by the board of trustees.

(d) After a member makes the deposits required by this section, the retirement system shall grant the member one month of equivalent membership service credit for each month of credit approved.

(e) The retirement system shall deposit the amount of the actuarial present value of the service credit purchased in the member's individual account in the employees saving account.

(f) The board of trustees may adopt rules to administer this section, including rules that impose restrictions on the application of this section as necessary to cost-effectively administer this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1231, Sec. 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2002.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 347 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2006.

Sec. 813.514. CREDIT PURCHASE OPTION FOR CERTAIN SERVICE. (a) This section applies only to a member who became a member before September 1, 2015.

(a-1) A member may establish service credit under this section in the employee class only for service performed during a 90-day waiting period to become a member after beginning employment or holding office.

(b) A member may establish service credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system, for each month of service credit, the actuarial present value, at the time of deposit, of the additional standard retirement annuity benefits that would be attributable to the purchase of the service credit under this section based on rates and tables recommended by the retirement system's actuary and adopted by the board of trustees.

(c) After a member makes the deposits required by this section, the retirement system shall grant the member one month of equivalent membership service credit for each month of credit approved.

(d) The retirement system shall deposit the amount of the actuarial present value of the service credit purchased in the member's individual account in the employees saving account.

(e) The board of trustees may adopt rules to administer this section, including rules that impose restrictions on the application of this section as necessary to cost-effectively administer this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1111, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 347 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 331 (H.B. 9), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.